Louisiana, session 2026, HB1110.
Be it enacted by the Legislature of Louisiana:
Section 1. R.S. 17:4036.1(A) is hereby amended and reenacted to read as follows:
§4036.1. Learning pods
A.(1) Each public school governing authority may establish learning pods
as an extension of any school under its jurisdiction. For purposes of this Chapter,
"learning pod" means a group of at least ten students enrolled in the school who
receive instruction in a small group setting.
(2)(a) Except as provided in Subparagraph (b) of this Paragraph, each
learning pod shall be located within the geographic boundaries of the public school
system in which the school is physically located.
(b) The provisions of Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph shall not apply to
a learning pod established prior to August 1, 2026. However, no additional students
Page 1 of 3
CODING: Words in struck through type are deletions from existing law; words underscored
are additions.

HLS 26RS-2438 ORIGINAL
HB NO. 1110
shall be assigned to a learning pod that does not comply with the provisions of
Subparagraph (a) of this Paragraph.
* * *